Louisiana, session 2026, HB1197.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1374(C) and 1378(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
37:1374(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1374. Penalty
* * *
C.(1) In addition to the authority provided in Subsection B of this Section,
and subject to the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., the State
Plumbing Board may assess administrative fines of not less than five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars per violation against any person or employing
entity for violations of this Chapter or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this
Chapter.
(2) An administrative fine pursuant to this Subsection may be assessed for
each separate violation, and shall do all of the following:
(a) Not require the filing of a consumer complaint.
(b) Be imposed only after notice and an opportunity for hearing as required
by the Administrative Procedure Act.
(c) Be independent of any criminal prosecution.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1910 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1197
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to supersede the exceptions
provided for in R.S. 37:1376 and 1377.
* * *
§1378. Revocation, of licenses suspension, and refusal to issue or renew
licenses; other disciplinary actions
A. The board may, pursuant to the procedures provided in the Administrative
Procedure Act, revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew, or refuse to issue any license or
endorsement, or issue cease-and-desist orders to assess administrative fines in
accordance with R.S. 37:1374, or otherwise discipline any licensee or applicant,
subject to the jurisdiction of the board issued by the board to any natural person.
Grounds for revocation, or lesser disciplinary action, include but are not limited to
the following:
(1) Conviction of a felony related to the practices regulated by this Chapter.
(2) Falsification of any material portion of a licensee's application or other
requisite submission to the board including but not limited to insurance, work,
training, or experience verifications.
(3) The habitual performance of the work regulated by this Chapter of either
a residential plumber limited, journeyman plumber, or a master plumber which is
substantially below the standards established by the Louisiana Department of Health,
or any of its agencies or offices, the state fire marshal, applicable adopted codes, or
board regulations or the habitual performance of work of a medical gas installer or
medical gas and vacuum systems verifier not in compliance with regulations of the
state fire marshal or related local governmental codes.
(4) The refusal of a master plumber, after notice from the board, to
accurately designate an employment entity in his application, his renewal thereof, or
upon any change in employment status Failure of a master plumber, master gas fitter,
or other licensee required by this Chapter to designate or maintain with an employing
entity, or to provide written notice to the board of any change in employment status.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1910 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1197
(5) The habitual practice of a master plumber to knowingly allow any
employing entity to hold itself out as engaging in the business of plumbing at a time
when the employing entity does not employ the master plumber as designated to the
board.
(6) The habitual practice of a residential plumber limited, journeyman
plumber, master plumber, medical gas piping installer, or holder of a water supply
protection specialist endorsement any licensee to knowingly allow any person not
licensed by the board to perform plumbing work, medical gas piping installation, or
the work of a water supply protection specialist, except as otherwise authorized work
regulated by this Chapter, except as otherwise authorized in this Chapter.
(7) A final determination of The the violation of any applicable municipal
or other local plumbing codes adopted code related to plumbing or gas fitting by any
local government entity not otherwise preempted by this Chapter or related
regulations as evidenced by adjudication before local governing authorities.
(8) The habitual violation Violation of any provision of this Chapter or any
by a master plumber, journeyman plumber, residential plumber limited, apprentice
plumber, medical gas piping installer, medical gas and vacuum systems verifier, or
holder of a water supply protection specialist endorsement of the rules and
regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this Chapter.
(9) The habitual violation of any rules or regulations adopted by the board
by a gas fitter or master gas fitter Past inability of the applicant or licensee to
lawfully and competently engage in work regulated in accordance with this Chapter,
as demonstrated by prior documented violations of this Chapter, adjudicated
violations of applicable codes, or prior disciplinary actions by another governmental
authority.
(10) The violation of any municipal code, any other code adopted by the
board related to gas fitting not otherwise preempted by this Chapter, or any other
related regulation as evidenced by an adjudication from a local governing authority
Any dishonest, fraudulent, deceptive, or grossly negligent act committed in the
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1910 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1197
course of performing work regulated by this Chapter or in communications with the
board.
(11) The refusal of a master gas fitter to accurately designate an employing
entity or provide notice of any change in employment with an employing entity
Abandoning regulated work or failing to perform any regulated work undertaken by
a licensee without justification.
(12) Final disciplinary action, including disqualification, suspension,
revocation, consent order, or other restriction of a license imposed by another state
or governmental entity, including but not limited to the State Licensing Board for
Contractors, constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by this board.
(13) Failure to maintain any qualification required for licensure pursuant to
this Chapter.
(14) Representing, advertising, publishing, or otherwise holding oneself out
as licensed or endorsed by the board when not in possession of a valid license or
endorsement issued pursuant to this Chapter.
(15) Performing any work regulated by this Chapter without proper licensure.
* * *